Utah statutes.
11-13-213.   Agreements for joint ownership, operation, or acquisition of facilities or improvements.

Any two or more public agencies may make agreements between or among themselves:

(1)  for the joint ownership of any one or more facilities or improvements which they have authority by law to own individually;

(2)  for the joint operation of any one or more facilities or improvements which they have authority by law to operate individually;

(3)  for the joint acquisition by gift, grant, purchase, construction, condemnation or otherwise of any one or more such facilities or improvements and for the extension, repair or improvement thereof;

(4)  for the exercise by an interlocal entity of its powers with respect to any one or more facilities or improvements and the extensions, repairs, or improvements of them; or

(5)  any combination of the foregoing.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

